Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2682YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 567 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. Subtract the net capital gain from 3 the sale of gold or silver. 4 b. Married individuals who file separate state income 5 tax returns shall allocate their combined annual net capital 6 gain exclusion under this subsection to each spouse in the 7 proportion that each spouseâs respective net capital gain bears 8 to the total net capital gain. 9 c. As used in this subsection, âgold or silverâ means bars, 10 coins, ingots, or commemorative medallions of gold or silver, 11 or pure gold or silver in any form. 12 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 13 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 14 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 15 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 16 or after that date. 17